Morphological-Analysis/Finnish-02/finnish.lexc
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Multichar_Symbols

+Noun                ! POS
+Verb                ! POS

!! LEXICON Verb-Inflection-I

+Infinitive-A
+1Person_Singular
+2Person_Singular
+1Person_Plural
+2Person_Plural
+3Person_Plural

!! LEXICON Noun-Inflection-I

+Nominative
+Genitive
+Inessive
+Adessive
+Allative
+Elative
+Ablative
+Essive
+Translative

!! %>                        !! morpheme boundary (Apertium)

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Root

Noun-stems ;
Verb-stems ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Clitics

# ;
+Interrog:ko    # ;
+Emphatic:kin   # ;
+Negative:kaan  # ;


LEXICON Verb-Inflection-I

+Infinitive-A:%>a   Clitics ;
+1Person_Singular:%>n   Clitics ;
+2Person_Singular:%>t   Clitics ;
+1Person_Plural:%>mme Clitics ;
+2Person_Plural:%>tte Clitics ;
+3Person_Plural:%>vat Clitics ;

!! for VERB-FR class: verbs with no back vowels
!!  LEXICON Verb-Inflection-FR
!!  
!!  +Infinitive-A:ä # ;
!!  +1Person_Singular:n # ;
!!  +2Person_Singular:t # ;
!!  +1Person_Plural:mme # ;
!!  +2Person_Plural:tte # ;
!!  +3Person_Plural:vät # ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Noun-Inflection-I

!! OK too: 
!! +Nom:    # ; !!                       Nominative

+Nominative:%>0    Clitics ; !!                    
+Genitive:%>n    Clitics ; !! of                 
+Inessive:%>ssa  Clitics ; !! in                 
+Adessive:%>lla  Clitics ; !! at                 
+Allative:%>lle  Clitics ; !! onto               
+Elative:%>sta  Clitics ; !! out-of from-within 
+Ablative:%>lta  Clitics ; !! from               
+Essive:%>na   Clitics ; !! as                 
+Translative:%>ksi  Clitics ; !! as-into            


!!  LEXICON Noun-Inflection-FR
!!  
!!  +Nominative:0    # ; !!                    
!!  +Genitive:n    # ; !! of                 
!!  +Inessive:ssä  # ; !! in                 
!!  +Adessive:llä  # ; !! at                 
!!  +Allative:lle  # ; !! onto               
!!  +Elative:stä  # ; !! out-of from-within 
!!  +Ablative:ltä  # ; !! from               
!!  +Essive:nä   # ; !! as                 
!!  +Translative:ksi  # ; !! as-into            


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Noun-stems

talo+Noun:talo    Noun-Inflection-I ;   ! (house)
pala+Noun:pala    Noun-Inflection-I ;   ! (piece)
savu+Noun:savu    Noun-Inflection-I ;   ! (smoke)

isä+Noun:isä      Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (father)
hissi+Noun:hissi  Noun-Inflection-I ;  ! (lift)


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
LEXICON Verb-stems

palaa+Verb:pala    Verb-Inflection-I ;   ! (burn)
ajaa+Verb:aja      Verb-Inflection-I ;   ! (drive)

kysyä+Verb:kysy    Verb-Inflection-I ;  ! (ask)
kestää+Verb:kestä  Verb-Inflection-I ;  ! (last)
